Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202550-1703
Division of Legislative Oversight; legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(1) It is within the inherent power of the Legislature to secure needed information in order to legislate, hold hearings, and conduct investigations of matters related to the operation of state government. This power of inquiry is broad and indispensable;

(2) Article IV, section 23, of the Constitution of Nebraska specifically provides that the Legislature may at any time require that information be provided to it from the officers and employees of state agencies relating to the condition, management, and expenses of their respective offices; and

(3) In order to assist the members of the Legislature in exercising their inherent, constitutional, and statutory authority to conduct investigations and provide oversight of the various agencies, branches, departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, councils, subunits, and committees of Nebraska state government, and to assist in the development of legislation to improve and enhance the operation of state government, the Legislature created the Division of Legislative Oversight.

Laws 2025, LB298, § 19.